Utah statutes.
41-6a-1003.   Pedestrians yielding right-of-way -- Limits on pedestrians.

(1)  A pedestrian crossing a roadway at any point other than within a marked crosswalk or within an unmarked crosswalk at an intersection shall yield the right-of-way to all vehicles on the roadway.

(2)  A pedestrian crossing a roadway at a point where there is a pedestrian tunnel or overhead pedestrian crossing shall yield the right-of-way to all vehicles on the roadway.

(3)  Between adjacent intersections at which traffic-control signals are in operation, a pedestrian may not cross at any place except in a marked crosswalk.

(4) (a)  A pedestrian may not cross a roadway intersection diagonally unless authorized by a traffic-control device.

(b)  If a pedestrian is authorized to cross diagonally under Subsection (4)(a), the pedestrian shall cross only as directed by the appropriate traffic-control device.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 2, 2005 General Session

